Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1863.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.510 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of State Highway 325 beginning at the intersection
of Ellis Avenue in Boise City extending northwesterly to the
Oklahoma-New Mexico border in Cimmaron County shall be designated as
the “John Skelley Memorial Highway”. The Department of
Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that
name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AERONAUTICS AND TRANSPORTATION
February 16, 2026 - DO PASS



SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1863 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)